California, session 20252026, AB304.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(a) The need for clinical laboratory scientists and medical laboratory technicians has grown in recent years at a rate severely disproportionate to the growth rate of educational training program opportunities for up-and-coming lab professionals.(b) With state law requiring that each clinical laboratory scientist or medical laboratory technician have experience in those programs, the process of students becoming professionals must be streamlined and provided for by the state.SEC. 2. Article 8 (commencing with Section 1330) is added to Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: Article 8. Clinical Laboratory Training Grant Program1330. (a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature for this express purpose, the Department of Health Care Access and Information, in coordination with the State Department of Public Health, shall establish a grant program to provide funding to clinical training programs that meet both of the following criteria:(1) Offer training programs for clinical laboratory scientists or medical laboratory technicians.(2) Are approved by the State Department of Public Health or accredited by a recognized accrediting program approved by the State Department of Public Health.(b) The Department of Health Care Access and Information may award grants to clinical training programs for the purpose of training new clinical laboratory scientists or medical laboratory technicians.(c) A grantee awarded a grant pursuant to subdivision (b) shall expend those funds within three years of receiving the grant.